California statutes. Elections Code
(c) Consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2226, this section is not intended and shall not be construed to authorize a voter with an inactive voter registration status to receive a vote by mail ballot for an election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 312, Sec. 1.   (AB 37)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3001.

No later than 29 days before the day of the election, the county elections official shall begin mailing the materials required by Section 3010. The county elections official shall have five days to mail a ballot to each
 active registered voter by the 29th day before the day of the election and five days for each voter who registers to vote after that date. The county elections official shall not discriminate against any region or precinct in the county in choosing which ballots to mail first within the prescribed five-day mailing period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 1.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

All persons granted confidentiality pursuant to Section 2166 shall (1) be required to vote by mail ballot, and (2) in addition to the required residence address, provide a valid mailing address to the county elections official to be used in place of the residence address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.

The vote by mail ballot shall be available to any registered voter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.

A county elections official shall place a notice in an office within the county where applications are taken for federal passports or where military enlistments are received to inform potential military or overseas voters of their right to a vote by mail voter’s ballot and where to obtain registration materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 3.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3005.

(a) Whenever, on the 88th day before the election, there are 250 or less persons registered to vote in any precinct, the elections official may furnish each voter with a vote by mail ballot along with a statement that there will be no polling place for the election. The elections official shall also notify each voter of the location of the two nearest polling places in the event the voter chooses to return the ballot on or before election day.

(b) A precinct shall not be divided in order to conform to this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 4.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.

(a) The elections official shall deliver all of the following to each qualified applicant:

(1) The ballot for the precinct in which the voter resides. In primary elections, this shall also be accompanied by the ballot for the central committee of the party for which the voter has disclosed a preference, if any.

(2) All supplies necessary for the use and return of the ballot, including an identification envelope with prepaid postage for the return of the vote by mail ballot.

(b) An officer of this state shall not make
 a charge for services rendered to a voter under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 120, Sec. 1.   (AB 216)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3011.

(a) The identification envelope shall contain all of the following:

(1) A declaration, under penalty of perjury, stating that the voter resides within the precinct in which the voter is voting and is the person whose name appears on the envelope.

(2) The signature of the voter.

(3) The residence address of the voter as shown on the affidavit of registration.

(4) The date of signing.

(5) A notice that the envelope contains an official ballot and is to be opened only by the canvassing board.

(6) A warning plainly stamped or printed on it that voting twice constitutes a crime.

(7) A warning plainly stamped or printed on it that the voter must sign the envelope in the voter’s own handwriting in order for the ballot to be counted.

(8) A statement that the voter has neither voted nor intends to vote a ballot from any other jurisdiction for the same election.

(9) The name and signature of the person authorized by the voter to return the vote by mail ballot pursuant to Section 3017.

(10) A statement next to where the voter signs that the county elections official is required to compare the voter’s signature appearing on the identification envelope with the signatures appearing in the
 voter’s registration record, which may include the signature appearing on the voter’s driver’s license or state identification card.

(b) Except at a primary election for partisan office, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the voter’s party preference may not be stamped or printed on the identification envelope.

(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (9) of subdivision (a), a ballot shall not be disqualified solely because the person authorized to return it did not provide on the identification envelope their name or signature.

(d) County elections officials may continue to use existing supplies prior to printing new identification envelopes that reflect the changes made to this section by the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 307, Sec. 1.   (SB 3)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3012.

Whenever the elections official is required to mail a vote by mail voter’s ballot to any elector and the address to which the ballot is to be mailed is a point outside the territorial limits of the United States, the elections official shall mail the vote by mail voter’s ballot to the elector by airmail and, if under any law of the United States official election ballots may be mailed without the payment of postage, the elections official shall so mail them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3013.

Upon delivering or mailing a vote by mail voter’s ballot, the elections official shall enter on the affidavit of registration the type of ballot and the date of delivering or mailing. Before the election the elections official shall send to the inspector of each precinct in their county or city a list of the voters in that precinct receiving ballots under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 13.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3014.

(a) The elections official shall provide a replacement ballot to any voter upon receipt of a replacement ballot request from the voter. Both of the following apply to a request made pursuant to this subdivision:

(1) The voter making the request shall provide to the elections official personal identifying information that matches the information contained on the voter’s affidavit of registration, including their first and last name, residence address, and date of
 birth.

(2) Prior to issuing a replacement ballot, the elections official shall advise the requester as follows: “Only the registered voter themself may request a replacement ballot. A request for a replacement ballot that is made by any person other than the registered voter is a criminal offense.”

(b) The elections official shall provide a
 replacement ballot to the voter’s representative upon receipt of a written request, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, signed by the voter under penalty of perjury, requesting that a ballot be provided to the voter’s representative. A ballot shall not be provided until both of the following occur:

(1) The elections official shall compare the signature on the written request with the signature or signatures in the voter’s record.

(2) The authorized representative shall sign an acknowledgment of receipt of the voter’s ballot.

(c) The voter shall mark the ballot, place it in the identification envelope, fill out and sign the identification envelope, and return the ballot pursuant to Section 3017. These
 ballots shall be processed and counted in the same manner as other vote by mail ballots.

(d) The elections official shall keep a record of each vote by mail voter ballot sent to and received from a voter and shall verify, prior to counting any duplicate ballot, that the voter has not attempted to vote twice. If it is determined that a voter has attempted to vote twice, both ballots shall be void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 650, Sec. 1.   (AB 398)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3015.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 14310, vote by mail voters who return to the polling place designated for their home precincts on or before election day, or go to a vote center established pursuant to Section 4005, or to the office or satellite office of an elections official where voting is permitted, shall be permitted to vote nonprovisional ballots if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) They surrender their vote by mail voter ballots to the inspector of the precinct board, a member of the vote center election board, or the elections official.

(2) They
 are unable to surrender their vote by mail voter ballots pursuant to paragraph (1) but the precinct board, vote center election board, or elections official does all of the following:

(A) Verifies that they have not returned their vote by mail ballots.

(B) Notates their voter records to ensure that their vote by mail ballots are not cast or tabulated after they vote at the polls.

(b) The precinct board and vote center election board shall return the unused vote by mail voters’ ballots surrendered pursuant to subdivision (a) to the elections official in an envelope designated for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 22.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3016.

Vote by mail voters who return to the polling place designated for their home precincts on or before election day, or go to a vote center established pursuant to Section 4005, or to the office or satellite office of an elections official where voting is permitted, shall be issued a provisional ballot in accordance with Section
 14310 if neither of the conditions in subdivision (a) of Section 3015 is satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 22.5.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3016.3.

(a) No later than 29 days before the day of the election, any voter using a vote by mail ballot may, prior to the close of the polls on election day, vote the ballot at the office of the elections official or a satellite location. The voter shall vote the ballot in the presence of an officer of the elections official or in a voting booth, at the discretion of the elections official, but in no case may their vote be observed.

(b) For a statewide election, a county that does not conduct an election
 pursuant to Section 4005 shall provide at least one early voting location on the Saturday before the day of the election that is open for a minimum of six hours.

(c) (1) For purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b), the elections official shall do all of the following:

(A) Provide at least one voting unit that is certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State to allow voters with disabilities the access required under the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).

(B) Permit a voter to vote their vote by mail ballot as provided in Section 3016.5.

(C) Provide notice of any satellite location not later than
 two weeks before voting may occur at the satellite location.

(2) For purposes of the early voting location described in subdivision (b), the elections official shall also permit a voter to do all of the following:

(A) Return the voter’s vote by mail ballot.

(B) Register to vote, update the voter’s voter registration, and vote pursuant to Section 2170.

(C) Receive and vote a provisional ballot pursuant to Section 3016 or Article 5 (commencing with Section 14310) of Chapter 3 of Division 14.

(D) Receive a replacement ballot upon verification that a ballot for the same election has not been
 received from the voter by the county elections official. If the county elections official is unable to determine if a ballot for the same election has been received from the voter, the county elections official may issue a provisional ballot.

(E) Vote a regular, provisional, or replacement ballot using accessible voting equipment that provides for a private and independent voting experience.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   (AB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3016.5.

(a) A voter may vote their vote by mail ballot, without the identification envelope, in person at the office of the county elections official, a satellite location, the polling place designated for the voter’s home precinct, or a vote center established pursuant to Section 4005, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The county elections official or their staff, including any staff managing a satellite location, a precinct board, or a vote center election board, as applicable, has real-time access to the county elections official’s election management system, and does both of the following:

(A) Verifies that the
 voter has not returned a vote by mail ballot for that election.

(B) Changes the status of the voter in the election management system from a vote by mail voter to an in person voter.

(2) After the voter’s status has been changed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), the voter provides their name, address, and signature pursuant to Section 14216.

(3) The county elections official has established procedures to ensure that a voter who casts a ballot pursuant to this subdivision does not submit more than one vote by mail ballot without the identification envelope, and the precinct board or vote center election board complies with those procedures.

(b) A ballot cast pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be processed and counted in the same manner as a nonprovisional ballot cast in person at the polling place or vote center.

(c) The elections official shall provide notice of any satellite location not later than two weeks before voting may occur at the satellite location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 296, Sec. 3.   (AB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3016.6.

(a) The Secretary of State shall promulgate regulations setting forth procedures that a county elections official shall follow to allow a voter to vote their vote by mail ballot in person pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 3016.3 and Section 3016.5. Those procedures
 shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Procedures to check in a voter pursuant to the requirements of Section 14216.

(2) Procedures to verify that the voter’s vote by mail ballot is the correct ballot.

(3) Procedures to ensure the secrecy of the voter’s ballot.

(4) Procedures to ensure that a voter does not submit more than one vote by mail ballot without the identification envelope.

(b) In promulgating the regulations pursuant to subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall take into consideration different voting technologies and
 systems used in other counties, and shall consult with county registrars of voters and other election stakeholders.

(c) In preparing voter education and outreach plans and the templates for those plans pursuant to Section 2105, counties and the Secretary of State shall include information about opportunities for early voting and for voting and casting a vote by mail ballot in person as described in Sections 3016.3 and 3016.5. 

(d) The Secretary of State shall post regulations adopted or promulgated under this section on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 342, Sec. 1.   (SB 1420)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3016.7.

The county elections official shall permit any voter to cast a ballot using a certified remote accessible vote by mail system, regardless of whether the voter is a voter with disabilities or a military or overseas voter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 312, Sec. 3.   (AB 37)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3017.

(a) (1) All vote by mail ballots cast under this division shall be voted on or before the day of the election. After marking the ballot, the vote by mail voter shall do any of the following:

(A) Return the ballot by mail or in person to the elections official who issued the ballot.

(B) Return the ballot in person to a member of a precinct board at a polling place or vote center within the state.

(C) Return the ballot to a vote by mail ballot dropoff location within the state that is provided pursuant to Section 3025 or 4005.

(2) A vote by mail voter who is unable to return the ballot may designate another person to return the ballot to the elections official who issued the ballot, to the precinct board at a polling place or vote center within the state, or to a vote by mail ballot dropoff location within the state that is provided pursuant to Section 3025 or 4005. The person designated shall return the ballot in person, or put the ballot in the mail, no later than three days after receiving it from the voter or before the close of the polls on election day, whichever time period is shorter. Notwithstanding subdivision (d), a ballot shall not be disqualified from being counted solely because it was returned or mailed more than three days after the designated person received it from the voter, provided that the ballot is returned by the designated person before the
 close of polls on election day.

(3) The ballot must be received by the elections official who issued the ballot, the precinct board, or the vote by mail ballot dropoff location before the close of the polls on election day. If a vote by mail ballot is returned to a precinct board at a polling place or vote center, or to a vote by mail ballot dropoff location, that is located in a county that is not the county of the elections official who issued the ballot, the elections official for the county in which the vote by mail ballot is returned shall forward the ballot to the elections official who issued the ballot no later than eight days after receipt.

(b) The elections official shall establish procedures to ensure the secrecy of a ballot returned to a polling place and the security, confidentiality,
 and integrity of any personal information collected, stored, or otherwise used pursuant to this section.

(c) On or before March 1, 2008, the elections official shall establish procedures to track and confirm the receipt of voted vote by mail ballots and to make this information available by means of online access using the county’s elections division Internet Web site. If the county does not have an elections division Internet Web site, the elections official shall establish a toll-free telephone number that may be used to confirm the date a voted vote by mail ballot was received.

(d) The provisions of this section are mandatory, not directory, and a ballot shall not be counted if it is not delivered in compliance with this section.

(e) (1) A person designated to return a vote by mail ballot shall not receive any form of compensation based on the number of ballots that the person returns and an individual, group, or organization shall not provide compensation on this basis.

(2) For purposes of this paragraph, “compensation” means any form of monetary payment, goods, services, benefits, promises or offers of employment, or any other form of consideration offered to another person in exchange for returning another voter’s vote by mail ballot.

(3) A person in charge of a vote by mail ballot and who knowingly and willingly engages in criminal acts related to that ballot as described in Division 18 (commencing with Section 18000), including, but not limited to, fraud, bribery,
 intimidation, and tampering with or failing to deliver the ballot in a timely fashion, is subject to the appropriate punishment specified in that division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   (AB 306)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3019.

(a) (1) Upon receiving a vote by mail ballot, the elections official shall compare the signature on the identification envelope with either of the following to determine if the signatures compare:

(A) The signature appearing on the voter’s affidavit of registration or any previous affidavit of registration of the voter.

(B) The signature appearing on a form issued by an elections official that contains the voter’s signature and that is part of the voter’s registration record.

(2) All of the following apply to the comparison of signatures pursuant to this section, including the comparison of a voter’s signature on a
 signature verification statement, an unsigned identification envelope statement, or a combined vote by mail ballot signature verification statement and unsigned identification envelope statement, with the signature that is part of the voter’s registration record:

(A) A presumption exists that the signature on the identification envelope, signature verification statement, unsigned identification envelope statement, or provisional ballot envelope is the voter’s signature and that the vote will be counted.

(B) An exact match is not required for an elections official to determine that a voter’s signature is valid. The fact that signatures share similar characteristics is sufficient to determine that a signature is valid.

(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (D), the elections official shall consider explanations for
 discrepancies between signatures that are specified in regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State. For purposes of this subparagraph, explanations include a variation in signature style over time and the haste with which a signature is written.

(D) When comparing signatures, an elections official shall not review or consider any of the following:

(i) A voter’s party preference, race, or ethnicity.

(ii) A voter’s identifying information including gender, name, or address, except to confirm the identity of the voter.

(iii) The amount of time spent reviewing a signature.

(E) The elections official may consider characteristics of the written signature that are specified in regulations
 promulgated by the Secretary of State. For purposes of this subparagraph, characteristics include the slant of the signature, letter formation, and whether the signature is printed or written in cursive.

(F) The elections official may use facsimiles of voters’ signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with the law.

(G) In comparing signatures pursuant to this section, an elections official may use signature verification technology. If signature verification technology determines that the signatures do not compare, the signature is subject to the additional procedures described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(H) The variation of a signature caused by the substitution of initials for the first or middle name, or both, is not grounds for the elections official to
 determine that the signatures do not compare.

(I) A signature made using a mark such as an “X,” or made by a signature stamp, shall be presumed valid and shall be accepted if the signature meets the requirements of Section 354.5.

(b) If upon conducting the comparison of signatures pursuant to subdivision (a) the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the elections official shall deposit the ballot, still in the identification envelope, in a ballot container in the elections official’s office.

(c) (1) If upon conducting the comparison of signatures pursuant to subdivision (a) the elections official determines that the signature possesses multiple, significant, and obvious differing characteristics when compared to all signatures in the voter’s registration record, the
 signature is subject to the additional procedures described in paragraph (2).

(2) If the elections official makes the determination described in paragraph (1), the signature shall be rejected only if two additional elections officials each find beyond a reasonable doubt that the signature differs in multiple, significant, and obvious respects from all signatures in the voter’s registration record. If the officials determine that the signatures do not compare, the identification envelope shall not be opened and the ballot shall not be counted. The elections official shall write the cause of the rejection on the face of the identification envelope only after completing the procedures described in subdivision (d).

(d) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (E), on or before the next business day after a determination pursuant to
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) that a voter’s signature does not compare pursuant to subdivision (c), but not later than the applicable notification deadline after the election, the elections official shall send by first-class mail notice to the voter of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature no later than 5 p.m. on the day of the applicable receipt deadline after the election. The notice shall include a return envelope, with postage paid, for the voter to return a signature verification statement.

(B) If an elections official has a telephone number or email address on file for a voter whose signature does not compare pursuant to subdivision (c), the elections official shall notify the voter by telephone, a text message, or email of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature. If an elections official calls the voter and the voter does not answer, the elections official shall attempt to leave a voicemail message.

(C) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may send additional written notices to a voter identified pursuant to subdivision (c), and may also notify the voter in person or by other means of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature.

(D) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may use any information in a county’s election management system, or otherwise in the elections official’s possession, for the purpose of notifying the voter of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature.

(E) If it is impracticable under the circumstances for the elections official to send the notice described in subparagraph (A) on or before the next business day, including in the event of technological failure, the elections official shall send the notice as soon as practicable, but
 not later than the applicable notification deadline after the election.

(2) The notice and instructions shall be in substantially the following form. The elections official shall insert the date of the applicable receipt deadline after the election where indicated on the form.“READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY. FAILURE TO FOLLOW THESE INSTRUCTIONS MAY CAUSE YOUR VOTE BY MAIL BALLOT NOT TO COUNT.1. We have determined that the signature you provided on your vote by mail ballot does not compare with the
 signature(s) on file in your voter record. In order to ensure that your vote by mail ballot will be counted, the signature verification statement must be completed and returned as soon as possible.2. The signature verification statement must be received by the elections official of the county where you are registered to vote no later than 5 p.m. on [elections official to insert date of the applicable receipt deadline after the election]. 3. You must sign your name where specified on the signature verification statement (Voter’s Signature).4. Place the signature verification statement into the postage-paid return envelope if it is included with these instructions. If a return envelope is not included with these instructions, use your own mailing envelope addressed to your local elections official. Mail, deliver, or have the completed
 statement delivered to the elections official. If you mail your completed statement using your own envelope, be sure there is sufficient postage and that the address of the elections official is correct.5. If you do not wish to send the signature verification statement by mail or have it delivered, you may submit your completed statement by email or facsimile transmission to your local elections official, or by other electronic means made available by your local elections official, or submit your completed statement to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box before the close of the polls on election day.”(3) The notice and instructions shall be translated in all languages required in that county by Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).

(4) The elections official shall not reject a vote by mail ballot identified pursuant to subdivision (c) if each of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The voter delivers, in person, by mail, by fax, by email, or by other means, a signature verification statement signed by the voter and the elections official receives the statement no later than 5 p.m. on the day of the applicable receipt deadline after the election, or the voter, before the close of the polls on election day, completes and submits a signature verification statement to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box.

(B) Upon receipt of the signature verification statement, the elections official shall compare the signature on the statement with the signature on file in the voter’s record. The elections official shall not delay the comparison until later in the canvass.

(i) If upon conducting the comparison of signatures the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the elections official shall deposit the ballot, still in the identification envelope, in a ballot container in the elections official’s office.

(ii) If, under the standards and procedures of subdivision (c), a determination is made that the signatures do not compare, the identification envelope shall not be opened and the ballot shall not be counted. The elections official shall write the cause of the rejection on the face of the identification envelope.

(5) The signature verification statement shall be in substantially the following form and may be included on the same page as the notice and instructions specified in paragraph (2):“SIGNATURE VERIFICATION STATEMENTI,, am a registered voter of __________ County,State of California. I declare under penalty of perjury that I received and returned a vote by mail ballot. I am a resident of the precinct in which I have voted, and I am the person whose name appears on the vote by mail ballot envelope. I understand that if I commit or attempt any fraud in connection with voting, or if I aid or abet fraud or attempt to aid or abet fraud in connection with voting, I may be
 convicted of a felony punishable by imprisonment for 16 months or two or three years. I understand that my failure to sign this statement means that my vote by mail ballot will be invalidated.
Voter’s SignatureAddress” (6) If the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the official shall use the signature in the signature verification statement, even if returned untimely, to update the
 voter’s signature for future elections, including updating the signature database.

(7) A voter may work with a nongovernmental entity to complete the requirements of this subdivision.

(8) The signature verification statement shall contain, where the voter signs, a statement that the county elections official is required to compare the voter’s signature appearing on the signature verification statement with the signatures appearing in the voter’s registration record, which may include the signature appearing on the voter’s driver’s license or state identification card.

(e) (1) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, if an elections official determines that a voter has failed to sign the identification envelope, the elections official shall not reject the vote by mail ballot if
 the voter does any of the following:

(i) Signs the identification envelope at the office of the elections official during regular business hours no later than 5 p.m. on the day of the applicable receipt deadline after the election.

(ii) No later than 5 p.m. on the day of the applicable receipt deadline after the election, completes and submits an unsigned identification envelope statement in substantially the following form:“UNSIGNED IDENTIFICATION ENVELOPE STATEMENTI,, am a registered voter of __________ County,State of California. I declare under penalty of perjury that I received and returned a vote by mail ballot and that I have not and will not vote more than one ballot in this election. I am a resident of the precinct in which I have voted, and I am the person whose name appears on the vote by mail ballot envelope. I understand that if I commit or attempt any fraud in connection with voting, or if I aid or abet fraud or attempt to aid or abet fraud in connection with voting, I may be convicted of a felony punishable by imprisonment for 16 months or two or three years. I understand that my failure to sign this statement means that my vote by mail ballot will be invalidated.
Voter’s
 SignatureAddress” (iii) Before the close of the polls on election day, completes and submits an unsigned identification envelope statement, in the form described in clause (ii), to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (v), or before the next business day after discovering that a voter has failed to sign the identification envelope, but not later than the applicable
 notification deadline after the election, the elections official shall send by first-class mail notice and instructions to the voter of the opportunity to provide a signature no later than 5 p.m. on the day of the applicable receipt deadline after the election. The notice shall include a return envelope, with postage paid, for the voter to return the unsigned identification envelope statement.

(ii) If an elections official has a telephone number or email address on file for a voter who has failed to sign the identification envelope, the elections official shall notify the voter by telephone, a text message, or email of the opportunity to provide a signature. If an elections official calls the voter and the voter does not answer, the elections official shall attempt to leave a voicemail message.

(iii) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may send
 additional written notices to a voter identified pursuant to this subdivision, and may also notify the voter in person or by other means of the opportunity to provide a signature.

(iv) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may use any information in the county’s election management system, or otherwise in the elections official’s possession, for the purpose of notifying the voter of the opportunity to provide a signature.

(v) If it is impracticable under the circumstances for the elections official to send the notice described in clause (i) on or before the next business day, including in the event of technological failure, the elections official shall send the notice as soon as practicable, but not later than the applicable notification deadline after the election.

(C) If timely submitted,
 the elections official shall accept any completed unsigned identification envelope statement. Upon receipt of the unsigned identification envelope statement, the elections official shall compare the voter’s signature on the statement in the manner provided by this section. The elections official shall not delay the comparison until later in the canvass.

(i) If the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the elections official shall attach the unsigned identification envelope statement to the identification envelope and deposit the ballot, still in the identification envelope, in a ballot container in the elections official’s office.

(ii) If, under the standards and procedures of subdivision (c), a determination is made that the signatures do not compare, the identification envelope shall not be opened and the elections official shall provide notice to the voter
 pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).

(D) An elections official may use methods other than those described in subparagraph (A) to obtain a voter’s signature on an unsigned identification envelope statement.

(E) If the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the official shall use the signature in the unsigned identification envelope statement, even if returned untimely, to update the voter’s signature for future elections, including updating the signature database.

(2) Instructions shall accompany the unsigned identification envelope statement in substantially the following form. The elections official shall insert the date of the applicable receipt deadline after the election where indicated on the form.“READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY BEFORE COMPLETING THE STATEMENT. FAILURE TO FOLLOW THESE INSTRUCTIONS MAY CAUSE YOUR BALLOT NOT TO COUNT.

1. In order to ensure that your vote by mail ballot will be counted, your statement should be completed and returned as soon as possible, but no later than 5 p.m. on [elections official to insert date of the applicable receipt deadline after the election]. 2. You must sign your name on the line above (Voter’s Signature).3.Place the statement into the postage-paid return envelope if it is included with these instructions. If a
 return envelope is not included with these instructions, use your own mailing envelope addressed to your local elections official. Mail, deliver, or have delivered the completed statement to the elections official. If you mail your completed statement using your own envelope, be sure there is sufficient postage and that the address of the elections official is correct.4. If you do not wish to send the statement by mail or have it delivered, you may submit your completed statement by facsimile or email transmission to your local elections official, or by other electronic means made available by your local elections official, or submit your completed statement to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box before the close of the polls on election day.”(3) The notice and instructions shall be translated in all languages required in that county by
 Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).

(4) A voter may work with a nongovernmental entity to complete the requirements of this subdivision.

(5) The identification envelope statement shall contain, where the voter signs, a statement that the county elections official is required to compare the voter’s signature appearing on the identification envelope statement with the signatures appearing in the voter’s registration record, which may include the signature appearing on the voter’s driver’s license or state identification card.

(f) The Secretary of State shall publish on their internet website a single, combined vote by mail ballot signature verification statement and unsigned ballot identification envelope statement. An elections official shall include the combined statement